Hawaii statutes.
§231-15.8 Time for performing certain acts
postponed by reason of service in combat zone. (a) This section shall
apply to state tax laws set forth in this title 14 that provide for the filing
with the director of taxation of a return or statement of the tax or payment of
the amount taxable.

(b) This section applies to any individual
serving in the armed forces of the United States, or serving in support of the
armed forces, in an area designated by the President of the United States by
Executive Order as a combat zone for purposes of section 112 (with respect to
certain combat pay of members of the armed forces) of the federal Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, at any time during the periods designated by
the President by Executive Order as the periods of combatant activities in the
zone for the purposes of section 112, or when deployed outside the United
States away from the individual's permanent duty station while participating in
an operation designated by the Secretary of Defense as a contingency operation
(as defined in section 101(a)(13) of title 10, United States Code) or which
became such a contingency operation by operation of law, at any time during the
period designated by the President by Executive Order as the period of
combatant activities in such zone for purposes of such section or at any time
during the period of such contingency operation, or hospitalized as a result of
injury received while serving in such zone or operation during such time.

The period of service in the zone or operation,
plus the period of continuous qualified hospitalization attributable to the
injury, and the next one hundred eighty days thereafter, shall be disregarded
in determining in respect of any tax liability (including any interest,
penalty, additional amount, or addition to the tax) of the individual:

(1) Whether any of the following acts was performed
within the time prescribed therefor:

(A) Filing any tax return (except income tax
withheld at source);

(B) Payment of any tax (except income tax withheld
at source) or any installment thereof or any other liability to the State in
respect of such tax;

(C) Filing a tax appeal pursuant to chapter
232 or an action to recover moneys paid under protest pursuant to section
40-35(b) if the payment was for tax liability imposed pursuant to this title
14;

(D) Allowance of a credit or refund of any
tax;

(E) Filing a claim for credit or refund of
any tax;

(F) Bringing suit upon any claim for credit
or refund;

(G) Assessment of any tax;

(H) Giving or making any notice or demand for
the payment of any tax or with respect to any liability to the State in respect
of any tax;

(I) Collection by the director, by levy or
otherwise, of the amount of any liability in respect of any tax;

(J) Bringing suit by the State or any
representative of the State on its behalf in respect of any liability in
respect of any tax; and

(K) Any other act required or permitted under
the tax or revenue laws of the State pursuant to rules adopted by the director.

(2) The amount of any credit or refund.

(c) This section shall apply to the spouse of
any individual entitled to the benefits of this section. The preceding
sentence shall not cause this section to apply for any spouse for any taxable
year beginning more than two years after the date designated under section 112
(with respect to certain combat pay of members of the armed forces) of the
federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, as the date of termination
of combatant activities in a combat zone.

(d) The period of service in a designated
combat zone shall include the period during which an individual entitled to
benefits under this section is in a missing status, within the meaning of
section 6013(f)(3) (with respect to joint return where an individual is in
missing status) of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.

(e) Notwithstanding subsection (b), any action
or proceeding authorized by section 231-24 (regardless of the taxable year for
which the tax arose) as well as any other action or proceeding authorized by
law in connection therewith, may be taken, begun, or prosecuted. In any other
case in which the director determines that collection of the amount of any
assessment would be jeopardized by delay, subsection (b) shall not operate to
stay collection of the amount by levy or otherwise as authorized by law. There
shall be excluded from any amount assessed or collected pursuant to this
subsection the amount of interest, penalty, additional amount, and addition to
the tax, if any, in respect of the period disregarded under subsection (b). In
any case to which this subsection relates, if the director is required to give
any notice to or make any demand upon any person, the requirement shall be
deemed to be satisfied if the notice or demand is prepared and signed, in any
case in which the address of the person last known to the director is in an
area for which United States post offices under instructions of the Postmaster
General, by reason of the combatant activities, are not accepting mail for
delivery at the time the notice or demand is signed. In this case the notice
or demand shall be deemed to have been given or made upon the date it is
signed.

(f) The assessment or collection of any tax or
of any liability to the State in respect of any tax or any action or proceeding
by or on behalf of the State in connection therewith, may be made, taken,
begun, or prosecuted in accordance with law, without regard to subsection (b),
unless prior to the assessment, collection, action, or proceeding it is
ascertained that the person concerned is entitled to the benefits of subsection
(b).

(g) Treatment of individuals performing Desert
Shield services:

(1) Any individual who performed Desert Shield
services (and the spouse of the individual) shall be entitled to the benefits
of this section in the same manner as if the services were services referred to
in subsection (b).

(2) For purposes of this subsection, "Desert
Shield services" means any services in the armed forces of the United
States or in support of the armed forces if these services are performed in the
area designated by the President as the "Persian Gulf Desert Shield
area" and the services are performed during the period beginning on August
2, 1990, and ending on the date on which any portion of the Persian Gulf Desert
Shield area is designated by the President as a combat zone pursuant to section
112 (with respect to certain combat pay of members of the armed forces) of the
federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.

(h) For purposes of this section,
"qualified hospitalization" means any hospitalization outside the
United States and any hospitalization inside the United States, except that not
more than five years of hospitalization inside the United States may be taken
into account under this subsection. The five-year period of qualified
hospitalization inside the United States shall not apply for purposes of
applying this section with respect to the spouse of an individual entitled to
the benefits of subsection (b).

(i) If an individual is entitled to the
benefits of this section with respect to any return and the return is timely
filed (determined after the application of subsection (b)) section 231-23(d)(1)
with respect to the limitations for computing interest shall not apply and
interest shall be paid from the due date of the return regardless of when the
return is filed.

(j) If an individual is entitled to the
benefits of subsection (b), then, with respect to claiming any credit pursuant
to state tax laws set forth in this title 14 and any general credit enacted
pursuant to article VII, section 6, of the state constitution, the limitation
period prescribed for such claims shall be determined after the application of
subsection (b). [L 1991, c 208, §2; am L 2004, c 89, §2]

Note

The 2004 amendment applies to taxable years beginning after
December 31, 2003, except as otherwise provided in L 2004, c 89. L 2004, c 89,
§6.

Cross References

Civil relief for state military forces, see chapter 657D.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next